Hawaii statutes.
§138-5 Disbursements from the fund.
(a) Every public safety answering point shall be eligible to seek
disbursements from the fund to pay for the reasonable costs to lease, purchase,
or maintain all necessary equipment, including computer hardware, software, and
database provisioning, required by the public safety answering point to provide
technical functionality for the enhanced 911 service. Reasonable costs may
include expenses directly associated with the planning phases and training of
personnel in any new and emerging technologies involving enhanced 911. All
other expenses necessary to operate the public safety answering point,
including but not limited to those expenses related to overhead, staffing, and
other day-to-day operational expenses, shall continue to be paid through the
general funding of the respective counties.

(b) Every public safety answering point shall
be eligible to seek disbursements from the fund to pay for the reasonable costs
associated with having representatives, other than board members, on board
committees, including established and investigative committees.

(c) Each communications service provider may
request reimbursement from the fund of enhanced 911 service costs incurred;
provided that the costs:

(1) Are recoverable under section 138-4(d); and

(2) Have not already been reimbursed to the
communications service provider from the fund.

In no event shall a communications service provider
be reimbursed for any amount above its actual enhanced 911 communications
service costs allowed to be recovered under section 138-4(d).

(d) Every communications service provider may
seek disbursements from the fund to pay for the reasonable costs associated
with having representatives, other than board members, on board committees, including
established and investigative committees.

(e) After the expenses of the board are paid,
the public safety answering points shall be allocated two-thirds of the
remaining balance of the fund. The remaining one-third shall be available for
communications service provider cost recovery. The board shall determine the
reimbursement amounts for the public safety answering points, based on the
limitations set forth in section 138-5(a). The reimbursement level for each
communications service provider shall be limited:

(1) To one-third of the total contribution made by
the individual communications service provider into the fund; provided that
this method of direct reimbursement shall not be available to the provider of
wire line enhanced 911; and

(2) As provided in subsection (c). [L 2004, c 159, pt
of §2; am L 2011, c 168, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next